Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4212
Property tax credit; minimum amount; county treasurer; duties; disbursement to counties; Property Tax Administrator; State Treasurer; duties.

(1) For tax year 2007, the amount of relief granted under the Property Tax Credit Act shall be one hundred five million dollars. For tax year 2008, the amount of relief granted under the act shall be one hundred fifteen million dollars. It is the intent of the Legislature to fund the Property Tax Credit Act for tax years after tax year 2008 using available revenue. For tax year 2017, the amount of relief granted under the act shall be two hundred twenty-four million dollars. For tax year 2020 through tax year 2022, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be two hundred seventy-five million dollars. For tax year 2023, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be three hundred sixty million dollars. For tax year 2024, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be three hundred ninety-five million dollars. For tax year 2025, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be four hundred thirty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be four hundred forty-five million dollars. For tax year 2027, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be four hundred sixty million dollars. For tax year 2028, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be four hundred seventy-five million dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be the minimum amount from the prior tax year plus a percentage increase equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed value of all real property in the state from the prior year to the current year, as determined by the Department of Revenue, plus an additional seventy-five million dollars. For tax year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be the minimum amount from the prior tax year plus a percentage increase equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed value of all real property in the state from the prior year to the current year, as determined by the Department of Revenue. If money is transferred or credited to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund pursuant to any other state law, such amount shall be added to the minimum amount required under this subsection when determining the total amount of relief granted under the act. The relief shall be in the form of a property tax credit which appears on the property tax statement.

(2)(a) For tax years prior to tax year 2017, to determine the amount of the property tax credit, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the county under subdivision (4)(a) of this section by the ratio of the real property valuation of the parcel to the total real property valuation in the county. The amount determined shall be the property tax credit for the property.

(b) Beginning with tax year 2017, to determine the amount of the property tax credit, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the county under subdivision (4)(b) of this section by the ratio of the credit allocation valuation of the parcel to the total credit allocation valuation in the county. The amount determined shall be the property tax credit for the property.

(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for the relief provided in the act to the extent of any remaining liability after calculation of the relief provided by the homestead exemption. If the credit results in a property tax liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund. Upon the return of any funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each taxing unit in the county in the year the funds were returned, any collection fee retained by the county in such year, and the amount of unused credits returned.

(4)(a) For tax years prior to tax year 2017, the amount disbursed to each county shall be equal to the amount available for disbursement determined under subsection (1) of this section multiplied by the ratio of the real property valuation in the county to the real property valuation in the state. By September 15, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to be disbursed under this subdivision to each county and certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before January 31 and the second on or before April 1. After retaining one percent of the receipts for costs, the county treasurer shall allocate the remaining receipts to each taxing unit levying taxes on taxable property in the tax district in which the real property is located in the same proportion that the levy of such taxing unit bears to the total levy on taxable property of all the taxing units in the tax district in which the real property is located.

(b) Beginning with tax year 2017, the amount disbursed to each county shall be equal to the amount available for disbursement determined under subsection (1) of this section multiplied by the ratio of the credit allocation valuation in the county to the credit allocation valuation in the state. By September 15, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to be disbursed under this subdivision to each county and certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before January 31 and the second on or before April 1, except that in 2026, the second payment may occur as soon as administratively possible after April 1. After retaining one percent of the receipts for costs, the county treasurer shall allocate the remaining receipts to each taxing unit based on its share of the credits granted to all taxpayers in the taxing unit.

(5) For purposes of this section, credit allocation valuation means the taxable value for all real property except agricultural land and horticultural land, one hundred twenty percent of taxable value for agricultural land and horticultural land that is not subject to special valuation, and one hundred twenty percent of taxable value for agricultural land and horticultural land that is subject to special valuation.

(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund one hundred five million dollars by August 1, 2007, and one hundred fifteen million dollars by August 1, 2008.

(7) The Legislature shall have the power to transfer funds from the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund to the General Fund.

Laws 2007, LB367, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB1087, § 21;

Laws 2016, LB958, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 22;

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 136;

Laws 2021, LB509, § 14;

Laws 2023, LB243, § 13;

Laws 2024, LB126, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 172.
April 8, 2026